Tennessee, session 114, SB0716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-123, is amended by deleting the
language "January 15 of each year" and substituting instead "March 1 of each year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0716
002892
- 1 -